Utah statutes.
30-3-36.   Special circumstances.
(1)  When parent-time has not taken place for an extended period of time and
the child lacks an appropriate bond with the noncustodial parent, both parents
shall consider the possible adverse effects upon the child and gradually
reintroduce an appropriate parent-time plan for the noncustodial parent.
(2)  For emergency purposes, whenever the child travels with either parent,
all of the following will be provided to the other parent:
(a)  an itinerary of travel dates;
(b)  destinations;
(c)  places where the child or traveling parent can be reached; and
(d)  the name and telephone number of an available third person who would be
knowledgeable of the child's location.
(3)  Unchaperoned travel of a child under the age of five years is not
recommended.
